Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-4,110
Put-and-take trout fishing; fees; disposition.

All fees received pursuant to section 37-4,109 shall be remitted by the commission to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Game Fund, except that fees received from state park rentals or other state park activities shall be credited to the fund of the park from which such fees were derived.

Laws 1959, c. 158, § 2, p. 589;

Laws 1959, c. 152, § 3, p. 578;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-426;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 220.